Mississippi, session 2026, HB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, "agency" means the Department of Human Services, the State Department of Health or the Division of Medicaid, as the case may be. (2)  (a)  The Department of Human Services, the State Department of Health and the Division of Medicaid shall jointly prepare a single video providing information about proper nutrition, healthy eating habits, preventing and reducing obesity and the importance of breastfeeding infants, as further described in subsection (3) of this section.  The video shall be no more than twenty (20) minutes in length. (b)  The agency shall offer the video in an appropriate medium for presentation in the offices of the agency in which individuals apply for and/or receive benefits through the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children (WIC), the Medicaid program, the Children's Health Insurance Program (CHIP), or any combination of these programs. (c)  Applicants for and recipients of benefits provided by the agency through these programs may view the video in the offices of the agency.  The agency shall also make the video available to view on its website. (3)  At a minimum, the video must include information on the following topics: (a)  The health benefits of consuming nutritious foods, including fruits and vegetables; (b)  The recommended amount of food from each food group and subgroup as outlined by the most recent Dietary Guidelines for Americans; (c)  Selecting healthy options when shopping for food; (d)  The health benefits of regular physical activity; (e)  The recommended amount of physical activity per week as outlined by the most recent Physical Activity Guidelines for Americans; (f)  The health benefits of breastfeeding for both mothers and infants; (g)  Tips for successful breastfeeding; and (h)  Additional resources and programs available for further education on proper nutrition, healthy eating habits, preventing and reducing obesity and the importance of breastfeeding infants. (4)  The video shall be available to view, both in the offices of the agency and on the agency's website, not later than January 1, 2028. (5)  The Department of Human Services, the State Department of Health and the Division of Medicaid shall each review the video annually and shall collectively update the information in the video if deemed necessary upon review.  The updated video shall be made available to view, both in the offices of the agency and on the agency's website, as soon as reasonably practicable. SECTION 2.  Section 41-135-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-135-9.  For individuals who do not apply for and/or receive any of the benefits described in Section 1 of this act, the State Department of Health shall prepare a video in an appropriate medium for presentation in offices of the department in which the department provides benefits to women of child-bearing age, which shall provide information about the importance of breastfeeding infants. Applicants for and recipients of any such benefits provided by the department may view the video in the offices of the department; however, if applicants for and recipients of any such benefits provided by the department also apply for and/or receive any of the benefits described in Section 1 of this act, the department is not required to present a separate video to those individuals and may instead present only the video described in Section 1 of this act.  The department may provide the video to other state agencies that provide benefits to women of child-bearing age, for appropriate use by those agencies. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.